Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 4. Erosion and Sediment Control Law.

§§ 10.1-560 through 10.1-571.
Repealed by Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions related to Virginia erosion and sediment control program, see Article 2.4 (§ 62.1-44.15:51 et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, recodified Article 4 (§

10.1-560

et seq.) of Chapter 5 of Title 10.1, as Article 2.4 (§ 62.1-44.15:51 et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1. In addition to revision by Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, Article 4 was also amended by other acts passed at the 2013 Session. As required by § 30-152, the Code Commission has incorporated the majority of these amendments into the new sections. Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections. For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.